Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 142.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 142.3. As used in the Oklahoma Crime Victims


Compensation Act, Section 142.1 et seq. of this title:


1. “Allowable expense” means:


a. charges incurred for needed products, services and


accommodations, including, but not limited to, medical


care, wage loss, rehabilitation, rehabilitative


occupational training and other remedial treatment and


care,


b. any reasonable expenses related to the funeral,


cremation or burial,

Req. No. 2665 Page 1


c. reasonable costs for counseling family members of a


homicide victim,


d. reasonable costs associated with homicide crime scene


cleanup, and


e. reasonable cost of vehicle impound fees associated


with the collection and security of crime scene


evidence, and


f. educational expenses which may include, but not be


limited to, tuition and fees at a private school in


this state, tuition for a career and technology


program at a technology center school district in this


state, tuition and fees for courses at a public or


private institution of higher education in this state,


and cost of academic tutoring services provided by an


individual or a private academic tutoring facility in


this state;


2. “Board” means the Crime Victims Compensation Board created


by Section 142.4 of this title;


3. “Claimant” means any of the following persons applying for


compensation under the Crime Victims Compensation Act:


a. a victim,


b. a dependent of a victim who has died because of


criminally injurious conduct, or



Req. No. 2665 Page 2


c. a person authorized to act on behalf of any of the


persons enumerated in subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph;


4. “Collateral source” means a source of benefits or advantages


for economic loss for which the claimant would otherwise be eligible


to receive compensation under this act, and which the claimant has


received, or which is readily available to the claimant, from any


one or more of the following:


a. the offender,


b. the government of the United States or any agency


thereof, in the form of benefits, such as social


security, Medicare and Medicaid, a state or any of its


political subdivisions or an instrumentality or two or


more states, unless the law providing for the benefits


or advantages makes them excessive or secondary to


benefits under this act,


c. state-required temporary nonoccupational disability


insurance,


d. workers’ compensation,


e. wage continuation programs of any employer,


f. a contract providing prepaid hospital and other health


care services or benefits for disability,


g. a contract providing prepaid burial expenses or


benefits, or

Req. No. 2665 Page 3


h. proceeds of any contract of insurance payable to the


claimant for loss which the victim sustained because


of the criminally injurious conduct, except:


(1) life insurance proceeds or uninsured motorist


proceeds in an amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars


($50,000.00) or less shall not be considered a


collateral source when computing loss of support,


and


(2) life insurance proceeds and proceeds from


personal uninsured motorist coverage of any


amount shall not be considered a collateral


source for computing burial expenses;


5. a. “Criminally injurious conduct” means a misdemeanor or


felony which occurs or is attempted in this state, or


against a resident of this state in a state that does


not have an eligible crime victims compensation


program as such term is defined in the federal Victims


of Crime Act of 1984, Public Law 98-473, that results


in bodily injury, threat of bodily injury or death to


a victim which:


(1) may be punishable by fine, imprisonment or death,


or





Req. No. 2665 Page 4


(2) if the act is committed by a child, could result


in such child being adjudicated a delinquent


child.


b. Such term shall not include acts arising out of the


negligent maintenance or use of a motor vehicle


unless:


(1) the vehicle was operated or driven by the


offender while under the influence of alcohol,


with a blood alcohol level in excess of the legal


limit, or while under the influence of any other


intoxicating substance,


(2) the vehicle was operated or driven by the


offender with the intent to injure or kill the


victim or in a manner imminently dangerous to


another person and evincing a depraved mind,


although without any premeditated design to


injure or effect the death of any particular


person,


(3) the offense involved willful, malicious or


felonious failure to stop after being involved in


a personal injury accident to avoid detection or


prosecution, provided the victim of the accident


was a pedestrian or was operating a vehicle moved



Req. No. 2665 Page 5


solely by human power or a mobility device at the


time of contact, or


(4) the offense involving one or more vehicles


results in the death of the victim due to the


reckless disregard for the safety of others by


the offender. As used in this division,


“reckless disregard for the safety of others” is


defined as the omission to do something which a


reasonably careful person would do, or the lack


of the usual and ordinary care and caution in the


performance of an act usually and ordinarily


exercised by a person under similar circumstances


and conditions.


c. “Criminally injurious conduct” shall include an act of


terrorism, as defined in Section 2331 of Title 18,


United States Code, committed outside the United


States;


6. “Dependent” means a natural person wholly or partially


dependent upon the victim for care or support, and includes a child


of the victim born after the death of the victim where the death


occurred as a result of criminally injurious conduct;


7. “Economic loss of a dependent” means loss after death of the


victim of contributions of things of economic value to the



Req. No. 2665 Page 6


dependent, not including services which would have been received


from the victim if he or she had not suffered the fatal injury;


8. “Replacement services loss of dependent” means the loss


reasonably incurred by dependents after death of the victim in


obtaining ordinary and necessary services in lieu of those the


deceased victim would have performed for their benefit had the


deceased victim not suffered the fatal injury, less expenses of the


dependent avoided by reason of death of the victim and not


subtracted in calculating the economic loss of the dependent;


9. “Economic loss” means monetary detriment consisting only of


allowable expense, work loss, replacement services loss and, if


injury causes death, economic loss and replacement services loss of


a dependent, but shall not include noneconomic loss;


10. “Noneconomic detriment” means pain, suffering,


inconvenience, physical impairment and nonpecuniary damage;


11. “Replacement services loss” means expenses reasonably


incurred in obtaining ordinary and necessary services in lieu of


those the victim would have performed, not for income, but for the


benefit of self or family, if the victim had not been injured or


died;


12. “Traffic offense” means violation of a law relating to the


operation of vehicles, but shall not mean negligent homicide due to


operation of a motor vehicle, reckless driving, tampering with or


damaging a motor vehicle, failure of a driver of a motor vehicle

Req. No. 2665 Page 7


involved in an accident resulting in death or personal injury to


stop at the scene of the accident, leaving the scene of an accident


resulting in death or personal injury, operating or being in actual


physical control of a motor vehicle while intoxicated or impaired


due to alcohol or other intoxicating substance, or combination


thereof, or operating a motor vehicle with a blood alcohol content


in excess of the legal limit;


13. “Work loss for victim” means loss of income from work the


victim would have performed if such person had not been injured or


died, reduced by any income from substitute work actually performed


by the victim or by income the victim would have earned in available


appropriate substitute work that the victim was capable of


performing but unreasonably failed to undertake, or loss of income


from work the victim’s caregiver would have performed if the


injuries of the victim sustained as a result of the criminally


injurious conduct had not created the need for the caregiver to miss


work to care for the injured victim; and


14. “Victim” means a person who suffers personal injury or


death as a result of criminally injurious conduct and shall include


a resident of this state who is injured or killed by an act of


terrorism committed outside of the United States.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2665 TEK 1/15/2026 9:20:30 AM

Req. No. 2665 Page 8